Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8212
Designated rehabilitation centers, defined.

Designated rehabilitation centers means advanced, intermediate, or general level rehabilitation centers.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB46, § 4.